test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_almos_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - almos: # MLO, ok; A_ALMOS
    almos+A+Sg+Nom: almos             
    almos+A+Sg+Gen: almoos
    almos+A+Sg+Acc: almoos
    almos+A+Sg+Ill: almosân
    almos+A+Sg+Loc: almosist
    almos+A+Sg+Com: almosáin
    almos+A+Sg+Abe: almoosttáá
    almos+A+Ess: almosin                
    almos+A+Par: almosid                
    almos+A+Pl+Nom: almoseh
    almos+A+Pl+Gen: almosij
    almos+A+Pl+Acc: almosijd
    almos+A+Pl+Ill: almosáid
    almos+A+Pl+Loc: almosijn
    almos+A+Pl+Com: [almosijguin, almosijgijn]
    almos+A+Pl+Abe: almosijttáá

    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: almosub
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: almosub
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: almosub
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: almosuubon
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: almosubboost
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: almosubboin
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: almosubttáá
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: almosuboh
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: almosuboi
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: almosuboid
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: almosubboid
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: almosuboin 
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [almosuboiguin, almosuboigijn]
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: almosuboittáá
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: almosubbon
    almos+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: almosubbod

    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: almosumos
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: almosumos
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: almosumos
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: almosumosân
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: almosumosist
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: almosumosáin
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: almosumosttáá
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: almosumoseh
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: almosumosij
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: almosumosijd
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: almosumosáid
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: almosumosijn
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [almosumosijguin, almosumosijgijn]
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: almosumosijttáá
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: almosumosin
    almos+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: almosumosid
